Utah statutes.
4-2-5.   Submission of department's budget.

The commissioner, on or before October 1 of each year, shall submit an itemized budget for the department to the governor. The proposed budget shall contain a complete plan of proposed expenditures and estimated revenues for the ensuing fiscal year and shall be accompanied by a statement setting forth the revenues and expenditures for the fiscal year next preceding, and the current assets and liabilities of the department, including restricted revenue accounts and dedicated credits.



Enacted by Chapter 2, 1979 General Session

